Rhode Island, session 2025, SB67.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7-6.2 of the General Laws entitled "Workers' Cooperatives" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
7-6.2-3.1. Corporations organized for the purpose of furnishing skilled labor.
A corporation electing to be governed as a workers' cooperative, may in its articles of
incorporation or bylaws, indicate its intent to be so governed for the purpose of furnishing contract
labor for other entities; provided that, any individual performing said labor does so under
circumstances that demonstrate that the individual's relationship to the contracting entity is one of
an independent contractor furnishing skilled labor through the workers' cooperative corporation.
For the purpose of § 7-6.2-4(f), if an individual makes use of such a worker's cooperative to secure
work with another entity, but is not a member of the cooperative or is not furnishing services
directly to the cooperative, the terms of that subsection shall not apply to that individual.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000209
========